Utah statutes.
48-3a-1033.   Approval of interest exchange.

(1)  A plan of interest exchange is not effective unless it has been approved:

(a)  by all the members of a domestic acquired limited liability company entitled to vote on or consent to any matter; and

(b)  in a record, by each member of the domestic acquired limited liability company that will have interest holder liability for debts, obligations, and other liabilities that arise after the interest exchange becomes effective, unless:

(i)  the operating agreement of the limited liability company in a record provides for the approval of an interest exchange or a merger in which some or all of its members become subject to interest holder liability by the vote or consent of fewer than all the members; and

(ii)  the member consented in a record to or voted for that provision of the operating agreement or became a member after the adoption of that provision.

(2)  An interest exchange involving a domestic acquired entity that is not a limited liability company is not effective unless it is approved by the domestic entity in accordance with its organic law.

(3)  An interest exchange involving a foreign acquired entity is not effective unless it is approved by the foreign entity in accordance with the law of the foreign entity's jurisdiction of formation.

(4)  Except as otherwise provided in its organic law or organic rules, the interest holders of the acquiring entity are not required to approve the interest exchange.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

